Utah statutes.
32A-12-207 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Unlawful sale or furnishing during emergency.

During a period of emergency proclaimed by the governor to exist in an area of the state, it is unlawful for a person to sell, offer to sell, or otherwise furnish any alcoholic product in that area if the director of the department has publicly announced and directed that alcoholic products may not be sold, offered for sale, or otherwise furnished in that area during the period of emergency.

